Hawaii statutes.
[§844D-52] Anonymous analysis of specimens
and samples. Laboratories, including law enforcement laboratories, that
are accredited by [the] American Society of Crime Laboratory
Directors/Laboratory Accreditation Board or any certifying body approved by the
Director of the FBI who contract with the department may perform anonymous
analysis of specimens and samples for forensic identification as provided in
this chapter. [L 2005, c 112, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next